California, session 20252026, AB488.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10094.5 of the Insurance Code is repealed.10094.5.Within 90 days following the effective date of this section, the association shall file a new or amended rate application with the commissioner consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10091.SEC. 2. Section 10095.5 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10095.5. (a) The association shall establish and maintain an Internet Web site internet website and a statewide toll-free telephone number through which a person may receive information and assistance in applying for insurance through the plan. The association shall cause the toll-free telephone number to be published in all general distribution telephone directories in the state and shall include the toll-free telephone number and Internet Web site internet website address on all communications with an applicant or insured.(b) An insurance agent or broker transacting basic property insurance shall assist a person seeking his or her their help in obtaining basic property insurance coverage by any one of the following methods:(1) Making an application for insurance through the plan by submitting an application at the person’s request.(2) Providing the person with the California FAIR Plan’s Internet Web site internet website address and the toll-free telephone number.(3) Making an application for insurance, at the person’s request, and placing that person with or through an insurer that offers, or a surplus line broker that procures, basic property insurance coverage.